Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4461.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 506b. (1) If the secretary of state receives a legal presence document from an individual during a transaction with the secretary of state indicating that the individual is not a United States citizen, and the secretary of state determines the individual is currently registered to vote in this state, the secretary of state must compare the information in the qualified voter file for that individual to the department of state's motor vehicle database, SAVE, or any other relevant program to verify the citizenship status and voter eligibility of that individual. (2) If the secretary of state receives a response from the department of state's motor vehicle database, SAVE, or any other relevant program indicating that an individual described in subsection (1) is not a United States citizen, the secretary of state must provide a notice to that individual indicating both of the following: (a) The secretary of state has received information that the individual is not a United States citizen and not eligible to vote. (b) The individual's voter registration will be canceled 60 days after the date of the notice unless the individual provides to the secretary of state proof of United States citizenship or a written explanation that verifies United States citizenship by any other means. Proof of United States citizenship may be accompanied by a marriage license, certificate of divorce, or other documentation that indicates a name change. (3) If an individual described in subsection (1) fails to provide proof of United States citizenship or a written explanation of United States citizenship by any other means to the secretary of state within 60 days after receiving a notice under subsection (2), the secretary of state must cancel that individual's voter registration and remove that individual from the qualified voter file. (4) The secretary of state shall promulgate rules under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, that establish procedures for an individual to appeal the cancellation of the individual's voter registration. (5) As used in this section, "SAVE" means the Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program administered by the United States Department of Homeland Security, United States Citizenship and Immigration Services, Verification Division.